Massachusetts, session 194th, H3007.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “registered”, in line 353, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, the following words:- or
leased.
of 1